Hawaii statutes.
§123-4 Officers; appointment; term.
The officers of the naval militia shall be appointed by the governor and shall
consist of a commander, a lieutenant commander, a surgeon and a paymaster, each
with rank of lieutenant, and such other officers as may be designated by the
secretary of the navy. The term of commission shall be for four years. [L
1915, c 151, §4; RL 1925, §274; RL 1935, §7863; RL 1945, §13083; RL 1955,
§354-4; HRS §123-4]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next